Washington statutes.
RCW 35.57.040

Authorized charges, fees, and taxes—Gifts.

(1) The board of directors of the public facilities district may impose the following for the purpose of funding a regional center:

(a) Charges and fees for the use of any of its facilities;

(b) Admission charges under RCW 35.57.100;

(c) Vehicle parking charges under RCW 35.57.110; and

(d) Sales and use taxes authorized under RCW 82.14.048 and 82.14.390.

(2) The board may accept and expend or use gifts, grants, and donations for the purpose of a regional center. The revenue from the charges, fees, and taxes imposed under this section shall be used only for the purposes authorized by this chapter.

[ 1999 c 165 s 4.]